District of Columbia statutes.
47-2704

Suspension of license for violations.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby vested with authority to temporarily suspend the operation of the license herein provided for whenever he may believe that this subchapter, or any part thereof, or regulations made in pursuance thereof, are about to be or are being violated, and he shall thereupon forthwith institute the appropriate proceeding in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in accordance with this subchapter, and in the event that the said violation results in a conviction, then and in that event the license shall be and become null and void, but in the event that the said proceeding shall terminate in favor of the defendant, then and in that event the suspension of said license shall be at an end, and the license shall thereupon be restored and be in full force and effect.

Sept. 8, 1916, 39 Stat. 847, ch. 473, § 4
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Administrative procedure, generally, see § 2-501 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 47-2704.
1973 Ed., § 47-2204.